Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
PROCESSED FOOD

§147-51 Definitions. For the purpose
of this part, unless otherwise required by the context:

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Food product" or "product"
means any and all fruits, vegetables, nuts, and coffee, or part or parts
thereof, produced and processed within the State, any and all honey produced
and processed within the State or imported, and also any and all fish and
fishery products processed within the State.

"Process" means to can, preserve,
freeze, pickle, dry, or otherwise prepare, with or without any added
ingredients.

"Processed honey" means honey that
has been heated above one hundred twenty degrees Fahrenheit, or filtered
through a fine screen of less than one-sixty-fourth inch mesh, or treated with
diatomaceous earth, or in any other way that results in the loss of any natural
constituent of honey, such as plant pollen and enzymes. [L 1947, c 195, §1; RL
1955, §22-40; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §147-51; am
L 1983, c 257, §8; am L 2008, c 167, §6]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next